ja: ティッシュローションの成分: ローション配合; ローションなし; その他
nl: Inhoud van tissuelotion: Met lotion; Geen lotion; Overig
zh-CN: 纸巾内润肤乳含量: 含润肤乳; 不含润肤乳; 其他
hr-HR: Sadržaj losiona za maramice: Dodatak losiona; Bez losiona; Ostalo
vi: Nội dung dưỡng chất trong khăn giấy: Có chứa kem dưỡng; Không có kem dưỡng; Khác
tr: Mendil losyonu içeriği: Losyonla zenginleştirilmiş; Losyonsuz; Diğer
hu: Testápoló-tartalom: Testápolóval átitatott; Nincs testápoló; Egyéb
sk-SK: Obsah telového mlieka: Napustené emulziou; Bez emulzie; Iné
en: Tissue lotion content: Lotion infused; No lotion; Other
cs: Obsah pleťového mléka v ubrouscích: S mlékem; Bez mléka; Jiné
es: Contenido de la loción del pañuelo: Loción infundida; Sin loción; Otros
fr: Présence de lotion dans les mouchoirs: Enrichi en lotion; Pas de lotion; Autre
ko: 티슈 로션 함유 여부: 로션 함유; 로션 없음; 기타
sv: Innehåll av tissuelotion: Lotioninfunderad; Ingen lotion; Annat
de: Taschentuchlotion: Lotion-getränkt; Ohne Lotion; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Съдържание на лосиона за тъкани: Напоено с лосион; Без лосион; Друго
el: Περιεκτικότητα χαρτομάντιλου σε λοσιόν: Εγχυμένη λοσιόν; Χωρίς λοσιόν; Άλλο
lt-LT: Servetėlių losjono sudėtis: Pripildyta losjonu; Be losjono; Kita
sl-SI: Vsebina losjona za robčke: Losjon, prepojen; Brez losjona; Druga
th: ส่วนประกอบของโลชั่นในกระดาษทิชชู: มีโลชั่นผสม; ไม่มีโลชั่น; อื่นๆ
it: Contenuto della lozione per tessuti: Lozione infusa; Nessuna lozione; Altro
nb: Kreminnhold i papirlommetørkle: Lotion-infusert; Ingen lotion; Annet
zh-TW: 面紙乳液成分: 含乳液; 不含乳液; 其他
pt-PT: Teor de loção nos lenços: Com infusão de loção; Sem loção; Outro
ro-RO: Conținutul de loțiune al batistelor: Impregnat cu loțiune; Fără loțiune; Altele
da: Indhold i lommetørklæder med lotion: Lotiontilført; Ingen lotion; Andet
pt-BR: Conteúdo da loção para tecidos: Com loção incorporada; Sem loção; Outro
ru: Наличие лосьона в салфетках: С пропиткой лосьоном; Без лосьона; Другое
pl: Nasączenie chusteczek balsamem: Z dodatkiem balsamu; Bez balsamu; Inne
fi: Nenäliinan kosteusemulsiopitoisuus: Voidekäsitelty; Ei voidetta; Muu